Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4762.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 19. (1) This act shall does not apply to or prohibit a minor from engaging in any of the following activities: (a) Domestic work or chores in connection with a private residence. (b) Soliciting, distributing, selling, or offering for sale newspapers, magazines, periodicals, political, or advertising matter. (c) Shoe shining. (d) Services performed as a member of a recognized youth oriented organization that is engaged in citizenship training and character building, if the services are not intended to replace employees in occupations for which workers are ordinarily paid. (e) Employment in a business owned and operated by the parent or guardian of the minor. For the purposes of this subdivision, a business is considered to be owned by the parent or guardian of the minor if the parent or guardian is either the sole owner, partner, or stockholder in the business and a business is considered to be operated by the parent or guardian of the minor if he or she the parent or guardian devotes substantially all of his or her the parent's or guardian's working hours to the operation of the business. (f) Farm work if the employment is not in violation of a standard established by the department. of labor and economic growth. Farm work As used in this subdivision, "farm work" means the work activity designated in sector 11 - agriculture, forestry, fishing, and hunting, of the North American industry classification system Industry Classification System - United States, 1997, published by the office Office of management Management and budget. Budget. Farm work includes any practices performed on a farm as an incident to or in conjunction with farming operations, including preparation for market and delivery to storage, market, or carriers for transport to market. (g) Employment by a school, academy, or college in which the minor is enrolled if the minor is 14 years old of age or older. (h) Nonhazardous construction work or operations performed as an unpaid volunteer, if the construction work or operations are performed under adult supervision for a charitable housing organization. As used in this subdivision: (i) "Charitable housing organization" means a nonprofit charitable organization the primary purpose of which is the construction or renovation of residential housing for low-income individuals. (ii) "Family income" and "statewide median gross income" mean those terms as defined in section 11 of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1411. (iii) "Low-income person" means a person with a family income of not more than 60% of the statewide median gross income. (iv) "Nonhazardous construction work or operations" means construction work or operations that are performed at a construction site of a new or renovated single family home and do not involve the use of power tools, woodworking machinery, or hazardous substances or other activities that would constitute a great risk of serious injury. Activities that would constitute a great risk of serious injury include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (A) Excavation. (B) Highway, bridge, or street construction. (C) Wrecking. (D) Demolition. (E) New commercial or new multiple residential construction. (i) If the minor is 16 years of age or older, employment in residential building construction if all of the following conditions are met: (i) The minor holds a valid 10-hour training certification issued by the Occupational Safety and Health Administration. (ii) The minor completed a state-approved career and technical education trades program. (iii) The minor works under the direct supervision of an individual who meets all of the following requirements: (A) Holds a valid 10-hour training certification issued by the Occupational Safety and Health Administration. (B) Is 21 years of age or older. (C) Has not less than 2 years of work experience related to the work that the individual is supervising. (iv) The minor does not work on any of the following structures that are taller than 6 feet: (A) Scaffolding. (B) Roof. (C) Superstructure. (D) Ladder. (v) The work is performed in compliance with all other applicable laws. (2) If a minor is required by law to attend school, the any work may only performed by the minor must be performed outside of school hours, unless the minor is enrolled and employed under a work-related educational program.